Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-511
Import shipments of fish or game; unlawful, when; violation; penalty.

Except as otherwise provided in the Game Law, it shall be unlawful for any person, firm, or corporation, acting as common carrier or otherwise, to bring into this state any fish or game from any state during the time that such other state prohibits the transportation of such fish or game from such state to a point without the same. Any person violating this section shall be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor and shall be fined at least fifty dollars.

Laws 1929, c. 112, V, § 7, p. 428;

C.S.1929, § 37-507;

R.S.1943, § 37-507;

Laws 1989, LB 34, § 30;

R.S.1943, (1993), § 37-507;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 231.